Tennessee statutes. Title 45 Banks And Financial Institutions
Chapter 10

Financial Records Privacy Act

45-10-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Financial Records Privacy Act.”

Acts 1983, ch. 224, § 1.

Cross-References. Confidential records, §10-7-504.

Confidentiality, disclosure and reproduction of banking information, §45-2-1603.

Confidentiality of savings and loan records, §45-3-807.

Confidentiality of writings, records or tangible objects obtained by attorney general, §8-6-407.

Disclosure of savings and loan information, reports as evidence, §45-3-814.

Record kept under seal, confidential records, access to certain records, preservation of records, §36-1-126.

Unlawful disclosure of savings and loan information, §45-3-1308.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 1-45.01-1.

Law Reviews.

Administrative Subpoenas and the Grand Jury: Converging Streams of Criminal and Civil Compulsory Process (Graham Hughes), 47 Vand. L. Rev. 573 (1994).

45-10-102. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, and in any subpoena issued pursuant to this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Custodian” means either the “immediate custodian,” or any person to whom the “immediate custodian” reports, the auditor or any other person designated by a corporation's board of directors to respond to a subpoena issued pursuant to this chapter. “Immediate custodian” means the person preparing, preserving, using, supervising the using or preparation of the financial records, and also includes any person to whom the person reports who is familiar with the preparation, use and maintenance of the records;

“Customer” means a depositor, borrower, member, lessee, other person, or the personal or legal representative or estate thereof, who has, has had, or has contemplated a relationship with the financial institution that caused the financial institution to create, obtain, preserve or maintain financial records pertaining to the person or the person's affairs;

“Financial institution” means a bank, savings and loan association, industrial loan and thrift company, credit union, mortgage broker, mortgage banker, or leasing company accepting deposits, making or arranging loans and making or arranging leases;

“Financial records” or “records” means any original document, any copy of an original document, or any information contained in the document, other than a customer's name, address, and account number, held by or in the custody of a financial institution, where the document, copy or information is identifiable as pertaining to one (1) or more customers of the institution;

“Government authority” means an agency or department of the state, or any officer, employee, or agent thereof;

“Issuer” means any person that causes to be issued a subpoena for the production of records;

“Person” means any individual, partnership, corporation, association, trust or any other legal entity organized under the laws of this state, including any department or agency of this state, any county or municipal corporation located in this state, and any court of this state or of the United States;

“Subpoena” means any writ, order, or other writing directed to a financial institution, or an officer thereof, and requiring the production of a financial record or records; and

“Supervisory agency” means:

The federal deposit insurance corporation;

The national credit union administration;

The federal reserve board;

The United States comptroller of the currency;

The department of financial institutions; and

Any other agency of this state or the United States that is empowered to regulate financial institutions.

Acts 1983, ch. 224, § 2; 1984, ch. 616, §§ 1-3; 1995, ch. 309, §§ 1, 2.

45-10-103. Permissible acts.

The following acts are expressly permitted by, but are not otherwise subject to, this chapter:

The preparation, examination, handling or maintenance of any financial records:

By any attorney, officer, employee or agent of a financial institution having custody of the records; or

By a certified public accountant engaged by the financial institution to perform an independent audit;

The examination of any financial records by, or the furnishing of financial records by a financial institution to, any officer, employee or agent of a supervisory agency for use solely in the exercise of the person's duties as an officer, employee or agent of the agency;

The publication of data furnished from financial records relating to customers where the data cannot be identified to any particular customer or account;

The making of reports or returns required under the tax laws and/or regulations of this state or the United States;

The furnishing of information permitted to be disclosed under article 3 of the Uniform Commercial Code, compiled in title 47, chapter 3, concerning the dishonor of any negotiable instrument;

The exchange in the regular course of business of credit information between a financial institution and other financial institutions or commercial enterprises, directly or through a credit reporting agency;

The furnishing of information or records deemed by a financial institution to be necessary or incidental to the performance of the duties of a federal, state or local official or agency;

The furnishing of information or records to a state or local official or agency in response to a subpoena lawfully issued by the official or agency. A financial institution may presume that a subpoena that appears valid on its face has been lawfully issued, if the subpoena shows on its face that it is in compliance with:

The notice requirements of § 45-10-106;

The delay provisions of § 45-10-117; or

An administrative subpoena issued by the department of human services pursuant to § 45-10-119;

The furnishing of information or records as a part of a financial institution's answer, or other pleading, in any action wherein the financial institution is a party, including being a garnishee;

The furnishing of information or records to any federal officer or agency as long as furnishing the information is not prohibited by the federal Right to Financial Privacy Act of 1978;

The furnishing of information or records in response to any allegation made by a customer;

The furnishing of information or records where deemed necessary to comply with or to preserve rights under:

Any statute, ordinance, or regulation; or

Any contract to which the customer, or any person serving as surety, guarantor, or the like, is a party;

The furnishing of a copy of any negotiable, nonnegotiable or nontransferable instrument to any person named therein as a remitter, party, obligor, or obligee;

The furnishing of records concerning a loan or other obligation, and the obligor or obligors thereon, held by a financial institution to a purchaser or prospective purchaser of the obligation or a participation or interest therein; provided, that:

The purchaser, if a financial institution, shall hold the records subject to this chapter, to the same extent as if the obligor or obligors were customers of the purchaser; or

The purchaser, if not a financial institution, shall undertake not to disclose the records to any person, except:

To or with the consent of the obligors or the obligor's agent;

Pursuant to legal process served on the purchaser; or

As would be permitted under this section if the purchaser were a financial institution;

This subdivision (14) shall not be construed to impose or create a duty of disclosure on the part of a financial institution to a purchaser;

(A) The furnishing by a financial institution of information or records to an affiliate of the financial institution;

As used in this subdivision (15), “affiliate of a financial institution” is:

A corporation, eighty percent (80%) of any class of voting stock of which is owned, directly or indirectly, by the financial institution or by a corporation that, directly or indirectly, also owns eighty percent (80%) of any class of voting stock of the financial institution; or

A corporation that owns, directly or indirectly, eighty percent (80%) of any class of voting stock of the financial institution;

The affiliate to whom the records and information are furnished shall hold the records or information subject to this chapter as if the affiliate were the financial institution furnishing the records or information; and

The furnishing by a financial institution of information or records to the extent permitted by the Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act of 1999 (Public Law 106-102); provided, the financial institution complies with the consumer disclosure requirements and opt-out provisions of the act.

Acts 1983, ch. 224, § 3; 1984, ch. 616, § 4; 1993, ch. 91, § 1; 1995, ch. 309, § 3; 2001, ch. 156, § 1; 2017, ch. 264, § 2; 2019, ch. 340, § 18; 2020, ch. 605, § 6.

Compiler's Notes. The Right to Financial Privacy Act of 1978, referred to in this section, is codified as 12 U.S.C. § 3401 et seq.

The Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act of 1999, referred to in this section, is codifed in various sections of 12 U.S.C. and as 15 U.S.C. § 6801 et seq.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment deleted “federal,” preceding “state” in the first sentence of (8).

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 605, § 10. March 20, 2020.

Law Reviews.

Administrative Subpoenas and the Grand Jury: Converging Streams of Criminal and Civil Compulsory Process (Graham Hughes), 47 Vand. L. Rev. 573 (1994).

Attorney General Opinions. Access to bank and telephone records for commercial purposes, OAG 98-160, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 160 (8/24/98).

45-10-104. Requisites for disclosure — Effect of disclosure.

Except as provided in § 45-10-103, a financial institution may not disclose to any person, except to the customer or the customer's agent, any financial records relating to that customer unless:

The customer has authorized disclosure to that person as provided in § 45-10-105; or

The financial records are disclosed in response to a lawful subpoena that meets the requirements of §§ 45-10-106 and 45-10-107.

Nothing in this chapter shall preclude any financial institution, or any officer, employee, or agent of a financial institution, from notifying a government authority that the institution, or officer, employee, or agent has information that the financial institution or its representative believes may be relevant to a possible violation of any statute or regulation. The information may include the name or other identifying or descriptive information concerning any individual, corporation, or account involved in any suspected illegal activity, and a description of the activity. The information may be disclosed notwithstanding any law or regulation of this state to the contrary. Nothing in this section shall create any duty to provide any information to a governmental authority except in accordance with subsection (a), nor relieve any duty to provide information to a governmental authority when otherwise required by law. Any financial institution, or officer, employee, or agent thereof making a disclosure of information pursuant to this subsection (b), shall not be liable to any person under any law or regulation of this state or political subdivision thereof, for disclosure or for any failure to disclose information required or permitted under this section.

Acts 1983, ch. 224, § 4; 1995, ch. 309, § 4; 2003, ch. 98, § 1.

Attorney General Opinions. Access to bank and telephone records for commercial purposes, OAG 98-160, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 160 (8/24/98).

45-10-105. Authorization by customer.

A customer may authorize disclosure of financial records pertaining to the customer by signing and dating a statement authorizing the disclosure; or, if acceptable to the financial institution, a customer may provide authorization orally. The authorization may specify:

The name of the person to which disclosure is authorized;

The financial records that are authorized to be disclosed; and

The period of time during which the authorization is effective.

No authorization shall be required by a financial institution as a condition of doing business with the financial institution.

Acts 1983, ch. 224, § 5.

Cross-References. Agricultural production input security interests, title 43, ch. 31.

Attorney General Opinions. Access to bank and telephone records for commercial purposes, OAG 98-160, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 160 (8/24/98).

45-10-106. Service of subpoena on financial institution.

A subpoena authorizing the production of financial records may be served upon a financial institution only if:

A copy of the subpoena has been served upon the customer, if the customer is available for service, in the manner provided by law for the service of subpoena, or, in any judicial proceeding in which the customer is a named party, a copy of the subpoena has been served on the customer in the manner provided for the service of pleadings subsequent to the original complaint by the Tennessee Rules of Civil Procedure; and

The customer, in the case of a judicial subpoena issued in a proceeding in which the customer is not a named party, has not moved to quash the subpoena within ten (10) days after service of a copy of the subpoena on the customer; or in the case of a nonjudicial subpoena, the customer has not notified the issuer, within ten (10) days after service of a copy of the subpoena on the customer, that the customer objects to the subpoena, in which case the issuer must petition an appropriate court and obtain approval of the court before issuing the subpoena. The appropriate court shall be any court of record in the county where the customer is located, if a resident of Tennessee; otherwise the county where the financial institution is located.

Acts 1983, ch. 224, § 6; 1984, ch. 616, § 5; 1995, ch. 309, § 5.

Cross-References. Investigative grand jury subpoenas to banks exempt from notice requirements, §40-12-214.

45-10-107. Requisites of subpoena.

A financial institution shall not be required to produce financial records in response to a subpoena unless:

The subpoena indicates that the requirements of § 45-10-106 have been met;

The subpoena describes with specificity the financial records to be produced, including:

The name and address of the customer to whom the records relate;

The name or functional description of the records;

The time period covered by the records; and

Any additional information necessary to identify the records sought;

The subpoena has been served upon the financial institution on a date that allows adequate time, which shall not be less than fifteen (15) days, within which to locate, copy and deliver the records; and

In civil actions, the subpoena contains a bond for costs incident to the subpoena as provided in § 45-10-108.

By agreement between the financial institution and the issuer or upon proper application to the appropriate court and after notice to the affected person, the fifteen-day period may be shortened where fifteen (15) days are not required, or may be lengthened where fifteen (15) days are not sufficient. Nothing herein shall restrict the power of the appropriate court for good cause shown to cause subpoenas to be issued or responses thereto to be made in less than any of the time periods set forth herein, including instanter.

A financial institution shall not be deemed to violate this chapter because it produces financial records in response to a subpoena containing the representation required under subdivision (a)(1), even if the representation is false and a claim to that effect is made to the financial institution, unless the production violates a court order duly served on the financial institution.

A financial institution refusing to comply with a subpoena that fails to meet all applicable requirements of subsection (a) need not file a motion to quash the subpoena, but shall notify the issuer of the grounds of its refusal within a reasonable time after being served with the subpoena.

A financial institution may file with the appropriate court a copy of the notice of refusal to comply with a subpoena that was conveyed to the issuer as provided in subsection (d). The copy shall contain a notice to the clerk of court, which shall be prominently on the face of the copy in substantially the following form:

Case / Docket No.

Notice to the clerk of court: Pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated §45-10-107, this notice shall suspend issuance of any order to show cause or compel a response to the subpoena issued to the financial institution filing this copy of a notice of refusal to comply with a subpoena.

Receipt of a copy of the notice submitted under subdivision (e)(1) by the clerk of the appropriate court shall serve as notice to the court that the court shall not issue an order to show cause or compel the financial institution to respond to a subpoena that the financial institution has determined fails to meet all the applicable requirements of subsection (a), unless the court deems that the requirements have been satisfied. The notice shall not prevent the court from issuing an order once a subpoena meets the requirements of subsection (a).

Acts 1983, ch. 224, § 7; 1995, ch. 309, § 6; 2008, ch. 788, § 1.

Cross-References. Investigative grand jury subpoenas to banks exempt from notice requirements, §40-12-214.

45-10-108. Bond.

On motion of any affected party, and for good cause shown, the court may require the person requesting the production of any records of a financial institution in a civil action to execute a bond, with sufficient surety, in an amount deemed sufficient by the court.

Acts 1983, ch. 224, § 8.

45-10-109. Expenses to be taxed as costs.

In all judicial proceedings, the reasonable expenses of a financial institution in producing records in response to a subpoena shall be taxed as costs, without regard to the amount of any bond, and in all other instances, the issuer shall pay the financial institution's reasonable expenses incurred in complying with the subpoena. The financial institution shall submit to the issuer, either with the records or within thirty (30) days after delivering the records, a statement as to its charges for preparing and delivering the records. Charges by the financial institution at rates that do not exceed those established by the financial institution’s published fee schedule shall be deemed reasonable unless otherwise determined by the appropriate court after notice and a hearing.

Acts 1983, ch. 224, § 9; 2017, ch. 264, § 4.

45-10-110. Compliance with subpoena duces tecum.

Except as hereinafter provided, when a subpoena duces tecum is served upon a custodian of records of any financial institution in an action or proceeding in which the financial institution is not a party, and the subpoena requires the production of all or any part of the records of the financial institution relating to any customer of the financial institution, it shall be sufficient compliance with the subpoena if the custodian within fourteen (14) days after being served with a subpoena duces tecum, files with the court clerk or the issuer, either by personal delivery or certified or registered mail, a true and correct copy, which may be a copy reproduced on film or other reproducing material by microfilming, photographing, photostating or other approximate process, or a facsimile, exemplification or copy of the reproduction or copy of all records specifically described in the subpoena.

Acts 1983, ch. 224, § 10.

Cross-References. Certified mail instead of registered mail, §1-3-111.

45-10-111. Wrapping and delivery of copy of records.

The copy of the records shall be separately enclosed in an inner envelope or wrapper, sealed, with the title and number of the action, name of custodian and date of subpoena clearly inscribed on the sealed envelope or wrapper. The sealed envelope or wrapper shall then be enclosed in an outer envelope or wrapper, sealed, and directed as follows:

If the subpoena directs attendance in court, to the clerk of the court or to the judge of the court;

If the subpoena directs attendance at a deposition, to the officer before whom the deposition is to be taken, at the place designated in the subpoena for the taking of the deposition or at the officer's place of business; or

In other cases, to the issuer.

Acts 1983, ch. 224, § 11.

45-10-112. Opening of sealed envelope.

Unless the sealed envelope or wrapper is returned to a witness who is to appear personally, the copy of the records shall remain sealed and shall be opened only at the time of trial, deposition, or other hearing, upon the direction of the judge, court, officer, body, tribunal or other issuer conducting the proceeding, in the presence of all parties who have appeared in person or by counsel at the trial, deposition, hearing or other proceeding.

Acts 1983, ch. 224, § 12.

45-10-113. Affidavit of custodian.

The records shall be accompanied by an affidavit of a custodian stating in substance that:

The affiant is duly authorized custodian of the records and has authority to certify the records;

The copy is a true copy of all the records described in the subpoena; and

The records were prepared by the personnel of the financial institution's business at or near the time of the act, condition or event reported therein.

If the financial institution has none of the records described, or only part of the records, the custodian shall so state in the affidavit and file the affidavit and the records that are available in the manner prescribed in this chapter. The filing of an affidavit with respect to reasonable charges shall be sufficient proof of the expense, which shall be taxed as costs of court.

Acts 1983, ch. 224, § 13.

45-10-114. Copy and affidavit as evidence.

The copy of the record shall be admissible in evidence to the same extent as though the original thereof were offered and the custodian had been present and testified to the matters stated in the affidavit. The affidavit shall be admissible in evidence and the matters stated therein shall be presumed true in the absence of a preponderance of evidence to the contrary. When more than one (1) person has knowledge of the facts, more than one (1) affidavit may be made.

Acts 1983, ch. 224, § 14.

45-10-115. Personal attendance of custodian — Form of subpoena.

Where the personal attendance of the custodian is required, the subpoena duces tecum shall contain a clause that reads:

“The procedure authorized pursuant to the Financial Records Privacy Act §§45-10-110 —45-10-113 will not be deemed sufficient compliance with this subpoena.”

Where both the personal attendance of the custodian and the production of the original record are required, the subpoena duces tecum shall contain a clause that reads:

“Original records are required, and the procedure authorized pursuant to the Financial Records Privacy Act §§45-10-110 —45-10-113 will not be deemed sufficient compliance with this subpoena.”

Where the personal attendance of the custodian is required, the immediate custodian or immediate custodians of the records required shall appear, and the custodian or custodians shall be compensated as witnesses, in addition to the reasonable cost of producing the records being taxed as costs of court.

Acts 1983, ch. 224, § 15.

45-10-116. Substitution of copies for original records.

In view of the property right of the financial institution in its records, original records may be withdrawn after introduction into evidence and copies substituted, unless otherwise directed for good cause by the court, judge, officer, body or tribunal conducting the hearing. The custodian may prepare copies of original records in advance of testifying for the purpose of making substitution of the original records, and the reasonable charges for making the copies shall be taxed as costs of court. If copies are not prepared in advance, they can be made and substituted at any time after introduction of the original record, and the reasonable charges for making the copies shall be taxed as costs of court.

Acts 1983, ch. 224, § 16.

45-10-117. Delay of customer notice — Required findings — Filing by court — Disclosure.

Upon application of a government authority, the customer notice required under § 45-10-106 may be delayed by an order of the chancery court of Davidson County, or the court issuing a lawful subpoena, if the presiding chancellor or judge finds that:

The investigation being conducted is within the lawful jurisdiction of the government authority seeking the financial records;

There is reason to believe that the records being sought are relevant to a legitimate law enforcement, investigative or administrative inquiry;

There is reason to believe that the notice will result in:

Endangering life or physical safety of any person;

Flight from prosecution;

Destruction of or tampering with evidence;

Intimidation of potential witnesses;

Jeopardizing an investigation or official proceeding or unduly delaying a trial or ongoing official proceeding; or

The public health, safety or welfare is threatened; and

The application for delay is made with reasonable specificity.

If the court makes the findings required in subdivisions (b)(1)-(4), it shall enter an ex parte order granting the requested delay for a period not to exceed ninety (90) days and an order prohibiting the financial institution from disclosing that records have been obtained or that a request for records has been made.

One (1) extension of the delay notice provided in subdivision (b)(1), of up to ninety (90) days, may be granted by the court upon application, but only in accordance with this section.

Upon expiration of the period of delay of notification under subdivision (b)(1) or (2), the customer shall be served with or mailed a copy of the subpoena by the government authority, together with the following legend specifying the nature of the law enforcement inquiry:

“Records or information concerning your transactions, which are held by the financial institution named in the attached process or request were supplied to or requested by the government authority named in the process or request on (date). Notification was withheld pursuant to a determination by (title of court so ordering) under the Financial Records Privacy Act that such notice might (state reason). The purpose of the investigation or official proceeding was .”

When access to financial records is obtained pursuant to § 45-10-107 (b), under emergency access, the government authority shall, unless a court has authorized delay of notice pursuant to subsections (a) and (b), as soon as practical after the records are obtained, serve upon the customer or mail by registered or certified mail to the customer's last known address a copy of the subpoena or other documents noting the judicial proceedings in which the customer is a party.

Any memorandum, affidavit, or other paper filed in connection with a request for delay in notification shall be preserved by the court. Upon petition by the customer to whom the records pertain, the court may order disclosure of the papers to the petitioner. If the petition is prior to the expiration of the period of delay ordered by the court or an extension thereof, the court may order disclosure, unless the court makes the findings required in subsection (a). If the petition is after expiration of the period of delay or an extension thereof, the court shall order disclosure unless the court makes a finding that the record should be sealed in the interest of justice.

Acts 1995, ch. 309, § 7.

Compiler's Notes. The Financial Records Privacy Act, referred to in (b)(3), is compiled in this chapter.

Cross-References. Certified mail instead of registered mail, §1-3-111.

45-10-118. Disclosure relative to child support enforcement.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, a financial institution shall disclose upon request to any Title IV-D child support agency of this state or any other state or territory or the federal government, their contractors or duly authorized agents, that are seeking to establish, modify, or enforce any child support obligation, any financial information, including, but not limited to, assets and liabilities, relative to any person who is the subject of any judicial or administrative action or process that establishes, modifies or enforces child support obligations.

Access to records upon request of the entities shall include automated access to data bases containing financial information wherever agreements pursuant to § 45-19-101 have been entered between the department of human services and any financial institution.

Notwithstanding any other law or regulation to the contrary, any financial institution or any financial institution's contractor that may process any records pursuant to this section that discloses pursuant to this section any financial record to any Title IV-D child support agency of this state or any other state or territory or the federal government, their contractors or duly authorized agents that are attempting to establish, modify or enforce a child support obligation shall not be liable under any law or regulation of this state to any person for the disclosure, and shall be absolutely immune from any civil or criminal liability for the disclosure in response to the requirements of this section.

A child support enforcement agency that obtains a financial record from a financial institution pursuant to this section or any other provision of law may disclose the information only as permitted pursuant to § 71-1-131.

For purposes of this section, “financial institution” means:

A depository institution, as defined in § 3(c) of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act (12 U.S.C. § 1813(c));

An institution-affiliated party, as defined in § 3(u) of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act (12 U.S.C. § 1813(u));

Any federal credit union or state credit union, as defined in § 101 of the Federal Credit Union Act (12 U.S.C. § 1752), including an institution-affiliated party of the credit union, as defined in § 206 of the Federal Credit Union Act (12 U.S.C. § 1786); and

Any benefit association, insurance company, safe deposit company, money market mutual fund, securities broker/dealer, or similar entity authorized to conduct business in this state.

For the purposes of this section, “financial record” has the meaning given the term by § 1101 of the Right to Financial Privacy Act of 1978 (12 U.S.C. § 3401).

For the production of financial information or financial records, other than those specifically provided in the data match provisions of ch. 19, part 1 of this title by contract with the financial institution, the department shall pay a reasonable fee not to exceed the actual cost to the financial institution for researching or producing financial records. A reasonable fee shall be deemed to be the lesser of the financial institution's ordinary and customary fees for producing customer records or the fees established by the federal reserve board for the production of records.

Acts 1997, ch. 551, § 13.

45-10-119. Administrative subpoena for records relevant to financial exploitation.

A financial institution shall provide access to or copies of records that are relevant to suspected actual or attempted financial exploitation, as defined in § 45-2-1202, in response to an administrative subpoena that satisfies the requirements of § 45-10-103(8) issued by the department of human services, adult protective services as provided in § 71-6-103(j)(4)(A). The records requested pursuant to this subsection (a) must be limited to historical records as well as records relating to the most recent transaction or transactions that may comprise financial exploitation not to exceed thirty (30) calendar days prior to the first transaction that was reported, or thirty (30) calendar days after the last transaction that was reported.

The administrative subpoena and records provided under this section are exempt from the customer consent and customer notice requirements of §§ 45-10-105 and 45-10-106.

A financial institution has up to fourteen (14) business days to respond to an administrative subpoena described in subsection (a).

The department of human services must provide notice to the customer whose records are requested pursuant to subsection (a) not later than thirty (30) days after receipt of the records from the financial institution. However, the department may delay the notice to the customer by seeking a judicial delay pursuant to § 45-10-117.

Acts 2017, ch. 264, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2017, ch. 264, § 6 provided that the Department of Financial Institutions is encouraged, within existing public or private resources, to consult with financial service providers as defined in this act, the Tennessee Commission on Aging and Disability, and the Department of Human Services to consider distributing public education and information to alert the public to the dangers posed to elderly and vulnerable adults by financial exploitation.